Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska69-1804
Manufacturer; provide information.

Any person engaged in manufacturing or producing American Indian arts and crafts shall provide accurate information to wholesale and retail sellers concerning the methods and materials used in manufacturing and producing such arts and crafts.

Laws 1986, LB 275, § 4.